Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1613
Authorization to operate; form; contents.

The authorization to operate shall be in a form approved by the department and shall state in a clear and conspicuous manner at least the following information:

(1) The date of issuance, effective date, and term of the authorization;

(2) The full, correct name and address of the school so authorized;

(3) The authority for authorization and conditions thereof; and

(4) Any limitation of authorization as deemed necessary by the commissioner.

The term for which authorization is given shall not extend for more than one fiscal year. For purposes of this section, fiscal year means the fiscal year established by the applicant school.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 14;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2814;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 489, § 2.